Vermont, session 2025-2026, H205.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 153 is added to read:
CHAPTER 153. FRANCHISE AGREEMENTS
§ 6061. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
VT LEG #379828 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.205
2025 Page 2 of 7
(1)(A) “Agreement not to compete” means an agreement between a
franchisor and franchisee that restricts the franchisee after separating from the
franchisor from operating its business:
(i) in a certain geographic area;
(ii) for a certain period of time; or
(iii) in any other way that significantly impacts the ability of the
franchisee to compete with the franchisor.
(B) An agreement not to compete does not include an agreement that
prohibits the disclosure of trade secrets as defined in section 4601 of this title
or a nondisclosure agreement that protects confidential business information
that does not constitute a trade secret.
(2) “Franchise agreement” means an agreement in which a franchisor
grants a franchisee the right to operate a business or to offer, sell, or distribute
goods or services identified or associated with the franchisor’s trademark.
(3) “Franchisee” means a person who currently operates or formerly
operated a business under a franchisor’s name, trademark, or other identifying
information, pursuant to a franchise agreement.
(4) “Franchisor” means a person that sells the right to operate a business
to a franchisee pursuant to a franchise agreement.
VT LEG #379828 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.205
2025 Page 3 of 7
§ 6062. AGREEMENTS NOT TO COMPETE; PROHIBITION; NOTICE
(a) Prohibition. Any agreement not to compete, including an agreement
not to compete contained within a contract or franchise agreement, is void and
unenforceable.
(b) Notice. For existing agreements not to compete that violate subsection
(a) of this section, the franchisor must notify each franchisee that is party to the
agreement that the agreement not to compete is void and legally unenforceable.
Notice shall be in the form of a written individualized communication
addressed to the franchisee or former franchisee and shall be delivered to the
last known address and email address of the franchisee or former franchisee.
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 495q is added to read:
§ 495q. AGREEMENTS NOT TO COMPETE; PROHIBITION;
EXCEPTIONS; NOTICE; EMPLOYEE RIGHTS
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Agreement not to compete” means an agreement between an
employer and an employee that restricts the employee after separating from
employment from performing:
(i) work for another employer for a specified period of time;
(ii) work in a specified geographical area; or
VT LEG #379828 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.205
2025 Page 4 of 7
(iii) work for another employer in a capacity similar to the
employee’s work for the employee’s former employer that is party to the
agreement.
(B) “Agreement not to compete” does not include:
(i) an agreement that prohibits the disclosure of trade secrets as
defined in 9 V.S.A. § 4601 or a nondisclosure agreement that protects
confidential business information that does not constitute a trade secret; or
(ii) a nonsolicitation agreement between an employer and an
employee, provided that the limitations set forth in the agreement are
reasonable in time, geographical area, and the scope of activity to be
restrained.
(2) “Nonsolicitation agreement” means an agreement between an
employer and employee pursuant to which the employee agrees not to:
(A) solicit or recruit the employer’s employees; or
(B) solicit or transact business with customers or clients of the
employer who were customers or clients while the employee was employed by
the employer.
(3) “Severance agreement” means an agreement between an employer
and employee pursuant to which the employee voluntarily agrees to leave
employment with the employer for a sum of money or other consideration.
VT LEG #379828 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.205
2025 Page 5 of 7
(b) Prohibition. An agreement not to compete, including an agreement not
to compete contained within a contract, is void and unenforceable.
(c) Exceptions. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an
individual from entering into an agreement not to compete in relation to:
(1) the sale of all or substantially all of the individual’s ownership
interest in:
(A) a business or its operating assets; or
(B) a subsidiary or division of a business or the operating assets of a
subsidiary or division of a business;
(2) the dissolution of a partnership in which the individual is a partner or
the dissociation of the individual from a partnership;
(3) the dissolution of a limited liability company in which the individual
is a member or the termination of an individual’s interest in a limited liability
company; or
(4) a severance agreement, provided that the limitations set forth in the
agreement are reasonable in:
(A) time, provided further that the limitation on time cannot exceed
the number of weeks or months of pay, however appropriately calculated, that
the employer offers to the employee in consideration to sign the agreement;
(B) geographical area; and
(C) the scope of activity to be restrained.
VT LEG #379828 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.205
2025 Page 6 of 7
(d) Wage threshold.
(1) Subject to subdivision (2) of this subsection, this section shall not
apply to an agreement not to compete between an employer and an employee
to whom the employer pays $100,000.00 or more annually in gross wages.
(2) An employer requiring a prospective employee to sign an agreement
not to compete that is in accordance with this section shall:
(A) provide the prospective employee with the proposed agreement
at the time the offer of employment to the prospective employee is made; and
(B) not rescind the offer of employment to the prospective employee
any earlier than three business days after the prospective employee receives the
agreement not to compete.
(e) Notice. For existing agreements not to compete that violate subsection
(b) of this section, the employer must notify each employee that is party to the
agreement that the agreement not to compete is void and legally unenforceable.
Notice shall be in the form of a written individualized communication
addressed to the employee or former employee and shall be delivered to the
last known address and email address of the employee or former employee.
(f) Employee rights. The provisions against retaliation in subdivision
495(a)(8) of this title and the penalty and enforcement provisions of section
495b of this title shall apply to this section.
VT LEG #379828 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.205
2025 Page 7 of 7
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379828 v.1